Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-928
Personal jurisdiction over licensee.

Obtaining a license pursuant to the Delayed Deposit Services Licensing Act shall constitute sufficient contact with the state for the exercise of personal jurisdiction over the licensee in any action arising out of the licensee's activities in this state.

Laws 1994, LB 967, § 28.